Utah statutes.
72-10-130.   Approval of expenditures for Civil Air Patrol.
An expenditure of state funds for the civil air patrol may not be made unless
a purchase order is first approved by the director of aeronautics under
guidelines established by the department and unless the funds are specifically
used as required in this chapter.
